incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="panáč/ik__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ika</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikovi</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ika</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikovi</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ik</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikom</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ik</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikov</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikom</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikov</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikoch</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikovia</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikmi</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikovia</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ika</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ka</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iku</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ik</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iku</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ik</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikom</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kom</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ik</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikov</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kov</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikom</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kom</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iky</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikoch</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>koch</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iky</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ikmi</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kami</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iky</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r>ik<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mla/ď__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>dí</l>
        <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ď<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="mla/ď__BASESG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ď<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="mla/ď__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="krížen/ec__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>covi</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>covi</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ec</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>com</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ec</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cov</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>com</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cov</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>coch</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cami</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cov</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>com</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>coch</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cami</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="biopredpoveď"><i>biopredpove</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chamraď"><i>chamra</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cicavec"><i>cicav</i><par n="krížen/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drobec"><i>drob</i><par n="krížen/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hruď"><i>hru</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="háveď"><i>háve</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jedinec"><i>jedin</i><par n="krížen/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kríženec"><i>krížen</i><par n="krížen/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="loď"><i>lo</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mlaď"><i>mla</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mokraď"><i>mokra</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odpoveď"><i>odpove</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="panáčik"><i>panáč</i><par n="panáč/ik__n"/></e>
    <e lm="papraď"><i>papra</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="predpoveď"><i>predpove</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samec"><i>sam</i><par n="krížen/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spoveď"><i>spove</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svalovec"><i>svalov</i><par n="krížen/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vzducholoď"><i>vzducholo</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="výpoveď"><i>výpove</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čeľaď"><i>čeľa</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šeď"><i>še</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žrď"><i>žr</i><par n="mla/ď__n"/></e>
